Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Penalties

178.990.
Penalties.

Any county road engineer who fails to comply with the provisions of KRS

178.050

shall be fined not less than ten ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

Any county road engineer who makes a change in the location of a road without complying with the provisions of this chapter shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25).

Any person who injures a sidewalk constructed under the provisions of KRS

178.290

and fails to repair or replace the sidewalk shall be fined not less than four ($4) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).

Any owner or occupier of a dam who fails to comply with the provisions of KRS

178.300

shall be fined two dollars ($2) for every twenty-four (24) hours of noncompliance. Where a milldam is carried away or destroyed, the owner or occupier shall not be subject to the fine until one (1) month after the mill has been put in operation.

If a fiscal court or county judge/executive willfully fails to perform any duty required of it by the provisions of this chapter, except KRS

178.170

and

178.210

to

178.240

, every member of such court concurring in the failure shall be fined not less than ten ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) by the Circuit Court of the county.

All fines imposed by this chapter shall be paid into the county road fund, except that in case of a privately owned road or bridge, the fines shall accrue to the owner.

No fines imposed by this chapter shall bar action for damages for breach of contract.

History.

4299, 4304, 4318, 4320, 4322, 4346, 4349: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 315, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

While the grand jury and courts cannot disturb the fiscal court when it is properly performing its ministerial duties in keeping the courthouse and county roads in proper repair, the members of the fiscal court would be subject to indictment and prosecution where charges are properly drawn alleging misfeasance or malfeasance in office, or wilful neglect in discharge of official duties.

OAG 72-88

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Penalty for failure of county engineer to prosecute, KRS

179.990

.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Moreland, Criminal Jurisdiction of the Kentucky Courts: A Tentative Codification. 47 Ky. L.J. 7 (1958).